California, session 20252026, AB1651.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6060.15 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:6060.15. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(2) “Artificial intelligence-generated content” means visual or textual content that is generated, in whole or in part, by generative artificial intelligence.(3) “Generative artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence that can generate derived synthetic content, including text, images, video, and audio, which emulates the structure and characteristics of the artificial intelligence’s training data.(4) “State Bar examinations” means the general bar examination, the first-year law students’ examination, as described in Section 6060, and the attorneys’ examination as described in Section 6062.(b) The For any content developed by or at the explicit direction of the State Bar, the State Bar shall disclose the use of artificial intelligence-generated content in developing or administering the State Bar examinations, including any related question, performance test, answer key, or scoring rubric.(c) The For any content developed by or at the explicit direction of the State Bar, the State Bar shall disclose the use of any artificial intelligence-generated content in study material, including sample or practice questions, model answers, selected answers, outlines, explanations, or other instructional materials prepared, published, endorsed, or distributed by the State Bar for use by applicants for the State Bar examinations.(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) apply regardless of whether the artificial intelligence-generated content is revised or reviewed by a natural person.(e) (1) A disclosure made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be posted on the State Bar’s internet website 60 days before the examination in which the artificial intelligence-generated content is used.(2) A disclosure made pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be made on the cover page of the study material.(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.